Nebraska, session 109, LB386.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 5 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Regional Mental Health Expansion Pilot Program Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that:
(1) The State of Nebraska is facing serious issues in its current
mental health system, including a shortage of mental health care
professionals and long travel distances to receive care. These issues
have had a negative impact on those suffering from mental health issues
and their communities, particularly in rural parts of the state;
(2) As a consequence, when an individual experiences a mental health
crisis in public, law enforcement officers are frequently required to
respond and take the individual into emergency protective custody until
the individual can be transported to an available mental health treatment
facility. This places a significant burden on law enforcement agencies,
particularly in rural parts of the state, which is compounded by the
shortage of mental health bed space and long travel distances to
facilities;
(3) Addressing these issues is vitally important to the state, and
the state would benefit from innovative solutions aimed at reducing the
negative impact of mental health issues on individuals and law
enforcement agencies;
(4) There is a history of cooperation between rural agencies and
communities that have successfully worked together to meet regional needs
efficiently and cost-effectively; and
(5) There is an opportunity to adapt the existing method of
cooperation and apply it in a way that helps reduce the impact on those
suffering from mental health issues and the law enforcement agencies that
interact with them.
Sec. 3. (1) The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal
Justice shall create a regional mental health expansion pilot program to
provide funding to a county law enforcement agency to expand mental
health beds and encourage cooperation between law enforcement agencies to
-2-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
service the region.
(2) The Legislature intends that the pilot program will demonstrate
a method of regional cooperation among law enforcement agencies to
address the impact of shortages and the long travel distances on those
suffering from mental health issues and law enforcement agencies and that
can be replicated statewide.
(3) The commission shall select one county law enforcement agency
for the pilot program. The selected agency shall:
(a) Have an existing jail facility with the capacity to add mental
health beds, either at that facility or elsewhere;
(b) Have a history of cooperation with other law enforcement
agencies;
(c) Provide an assessment of the anticipated regional impact of the
additional mental health beds on individuals with mental health issues
and law enforcement agencies; and
(d) Cooperate with other counties or law enforcement agencies
through a memorandum of understanding to ensure the mental health beds
provide a regional benefit.
(4) The Legislature does not intend the Regional Mental Health
Expansion Pilot Program Act to criminalize mental health issues or result
in the incarceration of individuals for mental health issues, and nothing
in the act should be so construed. The purpose of this pilot program is
to expand mental health services provided by law enforcement agencies to
individuals temporarily in custody for mental health issues.
Sec. 4. (1) The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal
Justice shall administer the pilot program and, in addition to the
requirements set out in section 3 of this act, develop grant eligibility,
application, and audit requirements.
(2) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out the Regional Mental Health Expansion Pilot Program Act.
(3) The commission shall identify grant funding to carry out the
-3-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
Regional Mental Health Expansion Pilot Program Act.
Sec. 5. The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal
Justice shall coordinate with the Attorney General to carry out the
Regional Mental Health Expansion Pilot Program Act.
Sec. 6. Section 71-901, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-901 Sections 71-901 to 71-964 and sections 9 and 10 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment
Act.
Sec. 7. Section 71-903, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-903 For purposes of the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections
71-904 to 71-914.02 and sections 9 and 10 of this act shall apply.
Sec. 8. Section 71-904, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-904 Administrator means the administrator or other chief
administrative officer of a treatment facility, medical facility, jail,
or Department of Correctional Services facility or his or her designee.
Sec. 9. Dangerous sex offender has the same meaning as in section
83-174.01.
Sec. 10. Videoconferencing means conducting or participating in a
hearing or evaluation electronically or telephonically with audiovisual
interaction among the participants.
Sec. 11. Section 71-915, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-915 (1) The presiding judge in each district court judicial
district shall create at least one but not more than three mental health
boards in such district and shall appoint sufficient members and
alternate members to such boards. Members and alternate members of a
mental health board shall be appointed for four-year terms. The presiding
-4-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
judge may remove members and alternate members of the board at his or her
discretion. Vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same
manner as provided for the original appointment. Members of the mental
health board shall have the same immunity as judges of the district
court.
(2) Each mental health board shall consist of an attorney licensed
to practice law in this state and any two of the following but not more
than one from each category: A physician, a psychologist, a psychiatric
nurse, a licensed clinical social worker or a licensed independent
clinical social worker, a licensed independent mental health practitioner
who is not a social worker, or a layperson with a demonstrated interest
in mental health and substance dependency issues. The attorney shall be
chairperson of the board. Members and alternate members of a mental
health board shall take and subscribe an oath to support the United
States Constitution and the Constitution of Nebraska and to faithfully
discharge the duties of the office according to law.
(3) The mental health board shall have the power to issue subpoenas,
to administer oaths, and to do any act necessary and proper for the board
to carry out its duties. No mental health board hearing shall be
conducted unless three members or alternate members are present and able
to vote. Any action taken at any mental health board hearing shall be by
majority vote. Any hearing before the mental health board may be
conducted by videoconferencing.
(4) The mental health board shall prepare and file an annual
inventory statement with the county board of its county of all county
personal property in its custody or possession. Members of the mental
health board shall be compensated and shall be reimbursed for their
actual and necessary expenses by the county or counties being served by
such board. Compensation shall be at an hourly rate to be determined by
the presiding judge of the district court, except that such compensation
shall not be less than fifty dollars for each hearing of the board.
-5-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
Members shall also be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses,
not including charges for meals. Mileage shall be determined pursuant to
section 23-1112.
Sec. 12. Section 71-919, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-919 (1)(a) A law enforcement officer may take a person into
emergency protective custody, cause him or her to be taken into emergency
protective custody, or continue his or her custody if he or she is
already in custody if the officer has probable cause to believe:
(i) Such person is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex
offender and that the harm described in section 71-908 or subdivision (1)
of section 83-174.01 is likely to occur before mental health board
proceedings under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex
Offender Commitment Act may be initiated to obtain custody of the person;
or
(ii) For a person domiciled within Indian country in Nebraska, that
such person is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender
under tribal law and that harm comparable to that described in section
71-908 or subdivision (1) of section 83-174.01 or the equivalent under
tribal law is likely to occur before mental health proceedings under
tribal law may be initiated to obtain custody of the person.
(b) Such person shall be admitted to an appropriate and available
medical facility, jail, or Department of Correctional Services facility
as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(c)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (1)(c)(ii) of this section,
each county shall make arrangements with appropriate facilities inside or
outside the county for such purpose and shall pay the cost of the
emergency protective custody of persons from such county in such
facilities.
(ii) For a subject domiciled within Indian country in Nebraska for
whom emergency protective custody is initiated under tribal law, the
-6-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
tribe shall make arrangements with appropriate facilities inside or
outside the tribe for such purpose and shall make arrangements for
payment of the cost of the emergency protective custody of persons from
such tribe in such facilities.
(d) A mental health professional who has probable cause to believe
that a person is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender
may cause such person to be taken into custody and shall have a limited
privilege to hold such person until a law enforcement officer or other
authorized person arrives to take custody of such person.
(2)(a) For purposes of this subsection, convicted sex offender means
a person with a prior conviction for an offense listed in section
29-4003.
(b) A person taken into emergency protective custody under this
section who is not a convicted sex offender shall be admitted to an
appropriate and available medical facility, except that such person may
instead be admitted to a jail with an available mental health bed under
the Regional Mental Health Expansion Pilot Program Act until an
appropriate medical facility is available unless such person has a prior
conviction for a sex offense listed in section 29-4003.
(c) (b) A person taken into emergency protective custody under this
section who is not a convicted sex offender has a prior conviction for a
sex offense listed in section 29-4003 shall be admitted to a jail or
Department of Correctional Services facility unless a medical or
psychiatric emergency exists for which treatment at a medical facility is
required. The person in emergency protective custody shall remain at the
medical facility until the medical or psychiatric emergency has passed
and it is safe to transport such person, at which time the person shall
be transferred to an available jail or Department of Correctional
Services facility.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(b) of this section,
upon admission to a facility or jail of a person taken into emergency
-7-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
protective custody by a law enforcement officer under this section, such
officer shall execute a written certificate prescribed and provided by
the Department of Health and Human Services. The certificate shall allege
the officer's belief that the person in custody is mentally ill and
dangerous or a dangerous sex offender and shall contain a summary of the
person's behavior supporting such allegations. A copy of such certificate
shall be immediately forwarded to the county attorney.
(b) In the case of a subject domiciled within Indian country who is
taken into emergency protective custody by a law enforcement officer
under tribal law, upon admission to a facility or jail, such officer
shall execute written documentation in a format provided by the tribe. At
a minimum, such documentation shall clearly identify the subject,
identify the relevant tribe, allege the officer's belief that the person
in custody is mentally ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender
under tribal law, and contain a summary of the subject's behavior
supporting such allegations. A copy of such documentation shall be
immediately forwarded to the appropriate tribal prosecutor or tribal
official.
(4)(a) (4) The administrator of the facility or jail shall have such
person evaluated by a mental health professional as soon as reasonably
possible but not later than thirty-six hours after admission. The mental
health professional shall not be the mental health professional who
causes such person to be taken into custody under this section and shall
not be a member or alternate member of the mental health board that will
preside over any hearing under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act
or the Sex Offender Commitment Act with respect to such person. The
evaluation may be conducted by videoconferencing if the mental health
professional thinks it appropriate under the circumstances.
(b) A person shall be released from emergency protective custody
after completion of such evaluation unless the mental health professional
determines, in his or her clinical opinion, that such person is mentally
-8-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
ill and dangerous or a dangerous sex offender. In the case of a subject
domiciled within Indian country who is taken into emergency protective
custody under tribal law, the mental health professional shall notify an
appropriate tribal prosecutor or official of such release.
Sec. 13. Section 71-920, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-920 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a
mental health professional who, upon evaluation of a person admitted for
emergency protective custody under section 71-919, determines that such
person is mentally ill and dangerous shall execute a written certificate
as provided in subsection (2) of this section not later than twenty-four
hours after the completion of such evaluation. A copy of such certificate
shall be immediately forwarded to the county attorney.
(2) The certificate shall be in writing and shall include the
following information:
(a) The subject's name and address, if known;
(b) The name and address of the subject's spouse, legal counsel,
guardian or conservator, and next-of-kin, if known;
(c) The name and address of anyone providing psychiatric or other
care or treatment to the subject, if known;
(d) The name and address of any other person who may have knowledge
of the subject's mental illness or substance dependence who may be called
as a witness at a mental health board hearing with respect to the
subject, if known;
(e) The name and address of the medical facility or jail in which
the subject is being held for emergency protective custody and
evaluation;
(f) The name and work address of the certifying mental health
professional;
(g) A statement by the certifying mental health professional that he
or she has evaluated the subject since the subject was admitted for
-9-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
emergency protective custody and evaluation; and
(h) A statement by the certifying mental health professional that,
in his or her clinical opinion, the subject is mentally ill and dangerous
and the clinical basis for such opinion.
(3) In the case of a subject domiciled within Indian country who is
taken into emergency protective custody by a law enforcement officer
under tribal law, a mental health professional who, upon evaluation of
such person, determines that such person is mentally ill and dangerous
shall execute appropriate written documentation in a format provided by
the tribe not later than twenty-four hours after the completion of such
evaluation. A copy of such certificate shall be immediately forwarded to
the person designated by the tribe.
Sec. 14. Section 71-922, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-922 (1) Mental health board proceedings shall be deemed to have
commenced upon the earlier of (a) the filing of a petition under section
71-921 or (b) notification by the county attorney to the law enforcement
officer who took the subject into emergency protective custody under
section 71-920 or the administrator of the treatment center or medical
facility or jail having charge of the subject of his or her intention to
file such petition. The county attorney shall file such petition as soon
as reasonably practicable after such notification.
(2) A petition filed by the county attorney under section 71-921 may
contain a request for the emergency protective custody and evaluation of
the subject prior to commencement of a mental health board hearing
pursuant to such petition with respect to the subject. Upon receipt of
such request and upon a finding of probable cause to believe that the
subject is mentally ill and dangerous as alleged in the petition, the
court or chairperson of the mental health board may issue a warrant
directing the sheriff to take custody of the subject. If the subject is
already in emergency protective custody under a certificate filed under
-10-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
section 71-919, a copy of such certificate shall be filed with the
petition. The subject in such custody shall be held in the nearest
appropriate and available medical facility and shall not be placed in a
jail or other correctional facility except as required or authorized by
subsection (2) of section 71-919. Each county shall make arrangements
with appropriate medical facilities inside or outside the county for such
purpose and shall pay the cost of the emergency protective custody of
persons from such county in such facilities.
(3) The petition and all subsequent pleadings and filings in the
case shall be entitled In the Interest of ........, Alleged to be
Mentally Ill and Dangerous. The county attorney may dismiss the petition
at any time prior to the commencement of the hearing of the mental health
board under section 71-924, and upon such motion by the county attorney,
the mental health board shall dismiss the petition.
Sec. 15. Section 71-924, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-924 (1) A hearing shall be held by the mental health board to
determine whether there is clear and convincing evidence that the subject
is mentally ill and dangerous as alleged in the petition.
(2) At the commencement of the hearing, the board shall inquire
whether the subject has received a copy of the petition and list of
rights accorded him or her by sections 71-943 to 71-960 and whether he or
she has read and understood them. The board shall explain to the subject
any part of the petition or list of rights which he or she has not read
or understood. The board shall inquire of the subject whether he or she
admits or denies the allegations of the petition. If the subject admits
the allegations, the board shall proceed to enter a treatment order
pursuant to section 71-925. If the subject denies the allegations of the
petition, the board shall proceed with a hearing on the merits of the
petition.
(3) A hearing before the mental health board under this section may
-11-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
be conducted by videoconferencing.
Sec. 16. Section 71-926, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-926 (1) At the conclusion of a mental health board hearing under
section 71-924 and prior to the entry of a treatment order by the board
under section 71-925, the board may (a) order that the subject be
retained in custody until the entry of such order and the subject may be
admitted for treatment pursuant to such order or (b) order the subject
released from custody under such conditions as the board deems necessary
and appropriate to prevent the harm described in section 71-908 and to
assure the subject's appearance at a later disposition hearing by the
board. A subject shall be retained in custody under this section at the
nearest appropriate and available medical facility and shall not be
placed in a jail or other correctional facility except as required or
authorized by subsection (2) of section 71-919. Each county shall make
arrangements with appropriate medical facilities inside or outside the
county for such purpose and shall pay the cost of the emergency
protective custody of persons from such county in such facilities.
(2) A subject who has been ordered to receive inpatient or
outpatient treatment by a mental health board may be provided treatment
while being retained in emergency protective custody and pending
admission of the subject for treatment pursuant to such order.
(3)(a) In the case of a subject domiciled within Indian country who
is taken into emergency protective custody by a law enforcement officer
under tribal law, at the conclusion of a mental health hearing under
tribal law and prior to entry of a treatment order by the tribal court,
the tribal court may order that the subject be:
(i) Retained in custody until entry of such order and the subject
may be admitted for treatment pursuant to such order; or
(ii) Released from custody under such conditions as the tribal court
deems necessary and appropriate to prevent harm comparable to that
-12-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
described in section 71-908 or the equivalent under tribal law and to
assure the subject's appearance at a later disposition hearing. A subject
shall be retained in custody under this section at the nearest
appropriate and available medical facility and shall not be placed in a
jail or other correctional facility except as required or authorized by
subsection (2) of section 71-919.
(b) Each tribe shall make arrangements with appropriate medical
facilities inside or outside the tribe for such purpose and shall make
arrangements for payment of the cost of the emergency protective custody
of persons from such tribe in such facilities.
(c) A subject who has been ordered to receive inpatient or
outpatient treatment pursuant to tribal law may be provided treatment
while being retained in emergency protective custody and pending
admission of the subject for treatment pursuant to such order.
Sec. 17. Section 71-939, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-939 (1)(a) When any person receiving treatment at a treatment
facility or program for persons with mental illness or substance
dependence pursuant to an order of a court or mental health board is
absent without authorization from such treatment facility or program, the
administrator or program director of such treatment facility or program
shall immediately notify the Nebraska State Patrol and the court or clerk
of the mental health board of the judicial district from which such
person was committed.
(b) The clerk shall issue the warrant of the board directed to the
sheriff of the county for the arrest and detention of such person. Such
warrant may be executed by the sheriff or any other peace officer.
(2)(a) When any person receiving treatment at a treatment facility
or program for persons with mental illness or substance dependence
pursuant to an order of a tribal court as provided in section 71-964 is
absent without authorization from such treatment facility or program, the
-13-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
administrator or program director of such treatment facility or program
shall immediately notify the Nebraska State Patrol and the appropriate
tribal prosecutor or official.
(b) The appropriate tribal official may issue a warrant directed to
a peace officer or sheriff of any county for the arrest and detention of
such person. Such warrant may be executed by the sheriff or any other
peace officer.
(3) The notification required by subdivision (1)(a) or (2)(a) of
this section shall include the person's name and description and a
determination by a psychiatrist, clinical director, administrator, or
program director as to whether the person is believed to be currently
dangerous to others.
(4) Pending the issuance of such warrant, any peace officer may
seize and detain such person when the peace officer has probable cause to
believe that the person is reported to be absent without authorization as
described in this section. Such person shall be returned to the treatment
facility or program or shall be taken to a facility or jail as described
in section 71-919 until he or she can be returned to such treatment
facility or program.
Sec. 18. Section 71-941, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-941 (1) A person arrested upon a warrant pursuant to section
71-940 shall not be delivered to a demanding state until he or she is
notified of the demand for his or her surrender and has had an
opportunity to apply for a writ of habeas corpus. If an application is
filed, notice of the time and place for hearing on the writ shall be
given to the county attorney of the county where the arrest was made. The
person arrested shall have the right to counsel and the right to have
counsel appointed for him or her if the person is indigent. Pending the
determination of the court upon the application for the writ, the person
detained shall be maintained in a suitable facility or jail as described
-14-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
in section 71-919 or a hospital for persons with mental illness.
(2) At a hearing on a writ of habeas corpus, the State of Nebraska
shall show that there is probable cause to believe that (a) such person
is absent without authorization from a treatment facility or program for
persons with mental illness or substance dependence to which he or she
was committed located in the demanding state, (b) the demanding state has
reason to believe that such person is currently dangerous to himself,
herself, or others, and (c) the demanding state is willing to accept the
person back for further treatment.
Sec. 19. Section 71-951, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-951 All mental health board hearings under the Nebraska Mental
Health Commitment Act shall be closed to the public except at the request
of the subject and shall be held in a courtroom or at any convenient and
suitable place designated by the mental health board. The board shall
have the right to conduct the proceeding where the subject is currently
residing if the subject is unable to travel. Any hearing before the
mental health board may be conducted by videoconferencing.
Sec. 20. Section 71-952, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-952 A subject shall appear personally or by videoconferencing and
be afforded the opportunity to testify in his or her own behalf and to
present witnesses and tangible evidence in defending against the petition
at the hearing.
Sec. 21. Section 71-954, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-954 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, a A
subject shall have the right at a hearing held under the Nebraska Mental
Health Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act to confront and
cross-examine adverse witnesses and evidence equivalent to the rights of
confrontation granted by Amendments VI and XIV of the United States
-15-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
Constitution and Article I, section 11, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
(2) This section does not prohibit a mental health board from
conducting a hearing using videoconferencing.
Sec. 22. Section 71-958, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-958 Any qualified mental health professional, upon being
authorized by the administrator of the treatment facility or jail having
custody of the subject, may provide appropriate medical treatment for the
subject while in custody, except that a subject shall not be subjected to
such quantities of medication or other treatment within such period of
time prior to any hearing held under the Nebraska Mental Health
Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act or, for a subject who
is domiciled in Indian country and committed for treatment as provided in
section 71-964, a hearing held under the equivalent tribal law, as will
substantially impair his or her ability to assist in his or her defense
at such hearing.
Sec. 23. Section 71-1203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-1203 For purposes of the Sex Offender Commitment Act:
(1) The definitions found in sections 71-904.02, 71-905, 71-906,
71-907, 71-910, 71-911, 71-914.01, 71-914.02, and 83-174.01 and sections
9 and 10 of this act apply;
(2) Administrator means the administrator or other chief
administrative officer of a treatment facility, medical facility, jail,
or Department of Correctional Services facility or his or her designee;
(3) Outpatient treatment means treatment ordered by a mental health
board directing a subject to comply with specified outpatient treatment
requirements, including, but not limited to, (a) taking prescribed
medication, (b) reporting to a mental health professional or treatment
facility for treatment or for monitoring of the subject's condition, or
(c) participating in individual or group therapy or educational,
-16-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
rehabilitation, residential, or vocational programs;
(4)(a) Subject means any person concerning whom (i) a certificate
has been filed under section 71-1204, (ii) a certificate has been filed
under section 71-919 and such person is held pursuant to subdivision (2)
(b) of section 71-919, or (iii) a petition has been filed under the Sex
Offender Commitment Act.
(b) Subject also includes a person who is a member of a tribe or
eligible for membership in a tribe, who is domiciled within Indian
country in Nebraska, and concerning whom sex offender involuntary
commitment or emergency protective custody proceedings have been
initiated under tribal law. Subject does not include any person under
eighteen years of age unless such person is an emancipated minor; and
(5) Treatment facility means a facility which provides services for
persons who are dangerous sex offenders.
Sec. 24. Section 71-1204, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-1204 (1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a
mental health professional who, upon evaluation of a person admitted for
emergency protective custody under section 71-919, determines that such
person is a dangerous sex offender shall execute a written certificate as
provided in subsection (2) of this section not later than twenty-four
hours after the completion of such evaluation. A copy of such certificate
shall be immediately forwarded to the county attorney.
(2) The certificate shall be in writing and shall include the
following information:
(a) The subject's name and address, if known;
(b) The name and address of the subject's spouse, legal counsel,
guardian or conservator, and next of kin, if known;
(c) The name and address of anyone providing psychiatric or other
care or treatment to the subject, if known;
(d) The name and address of any other person who may have knowledge
-17-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
of the subject's mental illness or personality disorder who may be called
as a witness at a mental health board hearing with respect to the
subject, if known;
(e) The name and address of the medical facility or jail in which
the subject is being held for emergency protective custody and
evaluation;
(f) The name and work address of the certifying mental health
professional;
(g) A statement by the certifying mental health professional that he
or she has evaluated the subject since the subject was admitted for
emergency protective custody and evaluation; and
(h) A statement by the certifying mental health professional that,
in his or her clinical opinion, the subject is a dangerous sex offender
and the clinical basis for such opinion.
(3) In the case of a subject domiciled within Indian country who is
taken into emergency protective custody by a law enforcement officer
under tribal law, a mental health professional who, upon evaluation of
such person, determines that such person is a dangerous sex offender
shall execute appropriate written documentation in a format provided by
the tribe not later than twenty-four hours after the completion of such
evaluation. A copy of such certificate shall be immediately forwarded to
the person designated by the tribe.
Sec. 25. Section 71-1206, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-1206 (1) Mental health board proceedings shall be deemed to have
commenced upon the earlier of (a) the filing of a petition under section
71-1205 or (b) notification by the county attorney to the law enforcement
officer who took the subject into emergency protective custody under
section 71-919 or the administrator of the treatment facility or jail
having charge of the subject of the intention of the county attorney to
file such petition. The county attorney shall file such petition as soon
-18-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
as reasonably practicable after such notification.
(2) A petition filed by the county attorney under section 71-1205
may contain a request for the emergency protective custody and evaluation
of the subject prior to commencement of a mental health board hearing
pursuant to such petition with respect to the subject. Upon receipt of
such request and upon a finding of probable cause to believe that the
subject is a dangerous sex offender as alleged in the petition, the court
or chairperson of the mental health board may issue a warrant directing
the sheriff to take custody of the subject. If the subject is already in
emergency protective custody under a certificate filed under section
71-919, a copy of such certificate shall be filed with the petition. The
subject in such custody, including pursuant to tribal law as provided in
section 71-1226.01, shall be held in an appropriate and available medical
facility, jail, or Department of Correctional Services facility. A
dangerous sex offender shall not be admitted to a medical facility for
emergency protective custody unless a medical or psychiatric emergency
exists requiring treatment not available at a jail or correctional
facility.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(b) of this section,
each county shall make arrangements with appropriate facilities inside or
outside the county for such purpose and shall pay the cost of the
emergency protective custody of persons from such county in such
facilities.
(b) For a subject domiciled within Indian country in Nebraska for
whom emergency protective custody is initiated under tribal law, the
tribe shall make arrangements with appropriate facilities inside or
outside the tribe for such purpose and shall make arrangements for the
payment of the cost of the emergency protective custody of persons from
such tribe in such facilities.
(4) The petition and all subsequent pleadings and filings in the
case shall be entitled In the Interest of . . . . . , Alleged to be a
-19-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
Dangerous Sex Offender. The county attorney may dismiss the petition at
any time prior to the commencement of the hearing of the mental health
board under section 71-1208, and upon such motion by the county attorney,
the mental health board shall dismiss the petition.
Sec. 26. Section 71-1208, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-1208 (1) A hearing shall be held by the mental health board to
determine whether there is clear and convincing evidence that the subject
is a dangerous sex offender as alleged in the petition.
(2) At the commencement of the hearing, the board shall inquire
whether the subject has received a copy of the petition and list of
rights accorded him or her by sections 71-943 to 71-960 and whether he or
she has read and understood them. The board shall explain to the subject
any part of the petition or list of rights which he or she has not read
or understood. The board shall inquire of the subject whether he or she
admits or denies the allegations of the petition. If the subject admits
the allegations, the board shall proceed to enter a treatment order
pursuant to section 71-1209. If the subject denies the allegations of the
petition, the board shall proceed with a hearing on the merits of the
petition.
(3) A hearing before the mental health board under this section may
be conducted by videoconferencing.
Sec. 27. Section 71-1223, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-1223 (1)(a) When any person receiving treatment at a treatment
facility or program for dangerous sex offenders pursuant to an order of a
court or mental health board is absent without authorization from such
treatment facility or program, the administrator or program director of
such treatment facility or program shall immediately notify the Nebraska
State Patrol and the court or clerk of the mental health board of the
judicial district from which such person was committed.
-20-

LB386 LB386
2025 2025
(b) The clerk shall issue the warrant of the board directed to the
sheriff of the county for the arrest and detention of such person. Such
warrant may be executed by the sheriff or any other peace officer.
(2)(a) When any person receiving treatment at a treatment facility
or program for persons with mental illness pursuant to an order of a
tribal court as provided in section 71-1226.01 is absent without
authorization from such treatment facility or program, the administrator
or program director of such treatment facility or program shall
immediately notify the Nebraska State Patrol and the appropriate tribal
prosecutor or official.
(b) The appropriate tribal official may issue a warrant directed to
a peace officer or sheriff of any county for the arrest and detention of
such person. Such warrant may be executed by the sheriff or any other
peace officer.
(3) The notification required by subdivision (1)(a) or (2)(a) of
this section shall include the person's name and description and a
determination by a psychiatrist, clinical director, administrator, or
program director as to whether the person is believed to be currently
dangerous to others.
(4) Pending the issuance of such warrant, any peace officer may
seize and detain such person when the peace officer has probable cause to
believe that the person is reported to be absent without authorization as
described in this section. Such person shall be returned to the treatment
facility or program or shall be taken to a facility or jail as described
in section 71-919 until he or she can be returned to such treatment
facility or program.
Sec. 28. Original sections 71-904, 71-915, 71-922, 71-924, 71-941,
71-951, 71-952, 71-954, and 71-1208, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 71-901, 71-903, 71-919, 71-920, 71-926, 71-939,
71-958, 71-1203, 71-1204, 71-1206, and 71-1223, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-21-